District of Columbia statutes.
7-1631

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“AIDS” means acquired immune deficiency syndrome.

(2)

“Department” means the Department of Health.

(3)

“HIV” means the human immunodeficiency virus.

(4)

“Program” means the Senior HIV/AIDS Education and Outreach Program established by § 7-1632.

(5)

“Senior” means an individual 50 years of age or older.

History

July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-152, § 2, 59 DCR 5136